North Carolina, session 2025, SB831.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 135-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 135-1. Definitions.
The following words and phrases as used in this Chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly
required by the context, shall have the following meanings:
…
(9a) "Emergency medical services personnel" or "EMS personnel" shall mean all
full-time employees of any State department, agency, or institution who meet
the definition of emergency medical services personnel under G.S. 131E-155.
This includes emergency medical dispatchers and the Director of EMS.
…
(11b) "Firefighter" shall mean all full-time employees of any State department,
agency, or institution who are actively serving in a position with assigned
primary duties and responsibilities for the prevention, detection, and
suppression of fire. This includes fire dispatchers, fire inspectors, and fire
marshals.
(11b)(11c) "Fraud investigation" means an independent review or examination by
Retirement Systems Division staff or authorized representatives who are
assisting the Retirement Systems Division staff of records, activities, actions,
or decisions by employers or other affiliated or associated entities having an
impact on the Retirement System. The purpose of a fraud investigation is to
help detect and prevent fraud and to ensure full accountability in the use of
pension funds.
(11c)(11d) "Law Enforcement Officer" means a full-time paid employee of an
employer who is actively serving in a position with assigned primary duties
and responsibilities for prevention and detection of crime or the general
enforcement of the criminal laws of the State of North Carolina or serving
civil processes, and who possesses the power of arrest by virtue of an oath
administered under the authority of the State. "Law Enforcement Officer" also
means a probation/parole officer as defined in this section with respect to any
*S831-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
service rendered on or after July 1, 2017. This includes police dispatchers,
police investigators, sheriff's deputies, bailiffs, corrections officers, detention
officers, and jailers.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 135-5(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(4b) Any member who is a law enforcement officer, firefighter, or emergency
medical services personnel and has completed 25 years of creditable service
may retire upon electronic submission or written application to the Board of
Trustees setting forth at what time, as of the first day of a calendar month, not
less than one day nor more than 120 days subsequent to the execution and
filing thereof, the member desires to be retired; provided, however, that any
member who has met the 25 years of creditable service required by this
subdivision but does not retire and later becomes employed other than as the
member was employed while completing 25 years of creditable service shall
continue to have the right to commence retirement."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 135-5(b21) reads as rewritten:
"(b21) Service Retirement Allowance of Non-First Responder Members Retiring on or After
July 1, 2019; and First Responder Members Retiring on or After July 1, 2019. July 1, 2019, but
Before January 1, 2027. – Upon retirement from service on or after July 1, 2019, in accordance
with subsection (a) or (a1) of this section, a member shall receive the following service retirement
allowance:
…."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 135-5 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(b22) Service Retirement Allowance of First Responders Retiring on or After January 1,
2027. – Upon retirement from service on or after January 1, 2027, in accordance with subsection
(a) or (a1) of this section and notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary,
a member who is a law enforcement officer, eligible former law enforcement officer, firefighter,
eligible former firefighter, emergency medical services personnel, or eligible former medical
services personnel shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:
(1) If the member's service retirement date occurs on or after the member's 55th
birthday and completion of five years of creditable service as a law
enforcement officer, as a firefighter, or as EMS personnel, or after the
completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to
one and eighty-two hundredths percent (1.82%) of the member's average final
compensation multiplied by the number of years of the member's creditable
service.
(2) If the member's service retirement date occurs on or after the member's 50th
birthday and before the member's 55th birthday with 15 or more years of
creditable service as a law enforcement officer, firefighter, or EMS personnel
and prior to the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the retirement
allowance shall be equal to the greater of the following amounts:
a. The service retirement allowance payable under subdivision (1) of this
subsection reduced by one-third of one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for
each month by which the retirement date precedes the first day of the
month coincident with or next following the month the member would
have attained age 55.
b. The service retirement allowance as computed under subdivision (1)
of this subsection reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference
between 25 years and the amount of creditable service at retirement."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 135-5(m)(1)b1. reads as rewritten:
Page 2 Senate Bill 831-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"b1. The member was a law enforcement officer who had obtained 15 years
of service as a law enforcement officer officer, or the member was a
firefighter who had obtained 15 years of service as a firefighter, or the
member was EMS personnel who had obtained 15 years of service as
EMS personnel, and was killed in the line of duty, in which case the
retirement allowance shall be computed in accordance with
G.S. 135-5(b21)(1)c., G.S. 135-5(b22)(1) notwithstanding the
requirement of obtaining age 50."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 128-21 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(9a) "Emergency medical services personnel" or "EMS personnel" means all
full-time rescue squad workers and all full-time employees of any employer
that participates in the Local Governmental Employees' Retirement System
who meet the definition of emergency medical services personnel under
G.S. 131E-155."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 128-27(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(6) Any member who is a law enforcement officer, firefighter, or emergency
medical services personnel who has completed 25 years of creditable service
may retire upon electronic submission or written application to the Board of
Trustees setting forth at what time, as of the first day of a calendar month, not
less than one day nor more than 120 days subsequent to the execution and
filing of the application, the member desires to be retired; provided, however,
that any member who has met the conditions required by this subdivision but
does not retire and later becomes employed other than as the member was
employed while completing 25 years of creditable service shall continue to
have the right to commence retirement."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 128-27(b22) reads as rewritten:
"(b22) Service Retirement Allowance of Member Non-First Responder Members Retiring
on or After July 1, 2019. July 1, 2019; and First-Responder Members Retiring on or After July
1, 2019, but Before January 1, 2027. – Upon retirement from service in accordance with
subsection (a) or (a1) of this section, on or after July 1, 2019, a member shall receive for members
other than law enforcement officers, firefighters, and EMS personnel, and on or after July 1,
2019, but before January 1, 2027, for law enforcement officers, firefighters, and EMS personnel,
the following service retirement allowance:allowance shall apply:
…."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 128-27 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(b23) Service Retirement Allowance of Law Enforcement Officers, Firefighters, and
Emergency Medical Services Personnel Retiring on or After January 1, 2027. – Upon retirement
from service in accordance with subsection (a) or (a1) of this section on or after January 1, 2027,
and notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, a member who is a law
enforcement officer, eligible former law enforcement officer, firefighter, eligible former
firefighter, EMS personnel, or eligible former EMS personnel shall receive a service retirement
allowance computed as follows:
(1) If the member's service retirement date occurs on or after the member's 55th
birthday and completion of five years of creditable service as a law
enforcement officer, as a firefighter, or as EMS personnel, or after the
completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to
one and eighty-five hundredths percent (1.85%) of the member's average final
compensation multiplied by the number of years of the member's creditable
service.
(2) If the member's service retirement date occurs on or after the member's 50th
birthday and before the member's 55th birthday with 15 or more years of
Senate Bill 831-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
creditable service as a law enforcement officer, firefighter, or EMS personnel
and prior to the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the retirement
allowance shall be equal to the greater of the following amounts:
a. The service retirement allowance payable under subdivision (1) of this
subsection reduced by one-third of one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for
each month by which the retirement date precedes the first day of the
month coincident with or next following the month the member would
have attained age 55.
b. The service retirement allowance as computed under subdivision (1)
of this subsection reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference
between 25 years and the amount of creditable service at retirement."
SECTION 2.(e) G.S. 128-27(m)(1)b1. reads as rewritten:
"b1. The member was a law enforcement officer who had obtained 15 years
of service as a law enforcement officer and was killed in the line of
duty, or the member was a firefighter or a rescue squad worker who
had obtained 15 years of service as a firefighter or a rescue squad
worker and was killed in the line of duty, or the member was EMS
personnel who had obtained 15 years of service as EMS personnel and
was killed in the line of duty, in which cases the retirement allowance
shall be computed in accordance with G.S. 128-27(b22)(1)c.,
G.S. 128-27(b23)(1), notwithstanding the requirement of obtaining
age 50."
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 143-166.41(b1) reads as rewritten:
"(b1) Eligibility for Allowance and Calculation of Allowance Amount. – To be eligible for
an allowance under this section, an officer is required to meet one of the following sets of criteria
that shall also determine the allowance amount:
(1) For officers meeting all of the following criteria, the annual special separation
allowance to be paid is equal to eighty-five hundredths percent (0.85%) of the
annual base rate of compensation most recently applicable to the officer for
each year of that officer's creditable service:
a. The For officers retiring before January 1, 2027, the officer (i) has
completed 30 or more years of creditable service or (ii) is 55 years of
age or older and completed five or more years of creditable service.
a1. For officers retiring on or after January 1, 2027, the officer (i) has
completed 25 or more years of creditable service or (ii) is 55 years of
age or older and completed five or more years of creditable service.
…
(2) For officers meeting all of the following criteria, the annual special separation
allowance to be paid is equal to eighty-five hundredths percent (0.85%) of the
annual equivalent of the base rate of compensation at the time the officer
attained 30 years of service multiplied by 30:
a. Prior For officers retiring prior to January 1, 2027, prior to attaining
62 years of age, the officer has completed 30 or more years of
creditable service, at least fifty percent (50%) of which was as a law
enforcement officer, or for service prior to July 1, 2017, as a
probation/parole officer.
a1. For officers retiring on or after January 1, 2027, prior to attaining 62
years of age, the officer has completed 25 or more years of creditable
service, at least fifty percent (50%) of which was as a law enforcement
officer, or for service prior to July 1, 2017, as a probation/parole
officer.
Page 4 Senate Bill 831-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 143-166.42(b1) reads as rewritten:
"(b1) Qualification for Allowance and Calculation of Allowance. – To be eligible for an
allowance under this section, an officer is required to meet one of the following sets of criteria,
which shall also determine the allowance amount:
(1) For officers meeting all of the following criteria, the annual special separation
allowance to be paid is equal to eighty-five hundredths percent (0.85%) of the
annual base rate of compensation most recently applicable to the officer for
each year of that officer's creditable service:
a. The For officers retiring before January 1, 2027, the officer (i) has
completed 30 or more years of creditable service or (ii) is 55 years of
age or older and completed five or more years of creditable service.
a1. For officers retiring on or after January 1, 2027, the officer (i) has
completed 25 or more years of creditable service or (ii) is 55 years of
age or older and completed five or more years of creditable service.
…
(2) For officers meeting all of the following criteria, the annual special separation
allowance to be paid is equal to eighty-five hundredths percent (0.85%) of the
annual equivalent of the base rate of compensation at the time the officer
attained 30 years of service multiplied by 30:
a. Prior For officers retiring before January 1, 2027, prior to attaining 62
years of age, the officer has completed 30 or more years of creditable
service, at least fifty percent (50%) of which was as a law enforcement
officer.
a1. For officers retiring on or after January 1, 2027, prior to attaining 62
years of age, the officer has completed 25 or more years of creditable
service or is 55 years of age or older and completed five or more years
of creditable service.
…."
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective January 1, 2027, and applies to eligible
retirements occurring on or after that date.
Senate Bill 831-First Edition Page 5